Arkansas, session 2025, SB80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - LEGISLATIVE ASSISTANCE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Office of the Governor, to be payable from the
Constitutional Officers Fund, for operating expenses of the Office of the
Governor for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) MAINTENANCE, OPERATION AND EXPENSES $226,250

SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. LIAISONS
AUTHORIZED. The Governor is hereby authorized to employ one (1) Lead
Legislative Liaison who shall serve without pay but shall be entitled to per
diem of up to two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) for each day the General
*JAR041*
01/21/2025 10:22:02 AM JAR041

SB80
Assembly is in Regular Session and nine (9) Legislative Liaisons who shall
serve without pay but shall each be entitled to per diem of up to two hundred
dollars ($200) for each day the General Assembly is in Regular Session.
After receiving approval of the Governor, the Department of Transformation
and Shared Services is hereby authorized to process payments to said Liaisons
from funds authorized by this Act.

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PAYMENT OF
PER DIEM. Per Diem as authorized in Section 2 - Liaisons Authorized of this
Act shall be in effect from and after January 13, 2025.

SECTION 4. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on the date of its passage and approval is
essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this
01/21/2025 10:22:02 AM JAR041

SB80
Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular
Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond the date of its
passage and approval could work irreparable harm upon the proper
administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore,
an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in
full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. If
the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become
effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor
may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last chamber overrides
the veto.
























01/21/2025 10:22:02 AM JAR041